Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
173A

[ACQUISITION
OF RESOURCE VALUE LANDS]

Section

173A-1 Purpose

173A-2 Definitions

173A-2.4 Legacy land conservation commission

173A-2.5 Responsibilities of the legacy land
conservation

commission

173A-2.6 Land acquisition priorities

173A-3 Resource land acquisition plan

173A-4 Authority to acquire and convey; easement
required

and exemption

173A-4.5 Appraisal of land

173A-5 Land conservation fund

173A-6 Acquisition of land

173A-7 Administration and management

173A-8 Development of land acquired by the board

173A-9 Grants to state agencies, counties, and
nonprofit

land conservation organizations

173A-10 Proceeds of sale, lease, or other
disposition

173A-11 General powers

173A-12 Federal and other grants

173A-13 Payment of debt service on the Turtle Bay

reimbursable general obligation bonds

Cross References

Acquisition of important agricultural lands, see §§163D-31 to
33.

Environmental courts, jurisdiction over proceedings arising
under this chapter, see §604A-2.

Important agricultural lands, see §§205-41 to 52.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next